Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5624.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 27-20.11-1 and 27-20.11-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-20.11
entitled "Autism Spectrum Disorders" are hereby amended to read as follows:
27-20.11-1. Mandatory coverage for autism spectrum disorders.
(a) Every group and individual health insurance contract, or every group hospital or
medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed
in this state, by any health insurance carrier, on or after January 1, 2012, shall provide coverage for
autism spectrum disorders;. provided, however, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply to
contracts, plans or group policies subject to the Small Employer Health Insurance Availability Act,
chapter 50 of this title, Medical Assistance, chapter 8 of title 40, or subject to the Individual Health
Insurance Coverage Act, chapter 18.5 of this title.
27-20.11-3. Scope of coverage.
(a) Benefits under this section chapter shall include coverage for pharmaceuticals, applied
behavior analysis, physical therapy, speech therapy, psychology, psychiatric and occupational
therapy services for the treatment of autism spectrum disorders, as defined in the most recent edition
of the DSM. Provided, however:
(1) Coverage for physical therapy, speech therapy, and occupational therapy and
psychology, psychiatry, and pharmaceutical services shall be, to the extent such services are a
covered benefit for other diseases and conditions under such policy; and
(2) Applied behavior analysis.

(b) Benefits under this section chapter shall continue until the covered individual reaches
age fifteen (15); provided, however, on or after January 1, 2026, no benefits shall be limited by the
age of the covered individual.
(c) The healthcare benefits outlined in this chapter apply only to services delivered within
the state of Rhode Island; provided, that all health insurance carriers shall be required to provide
coverage for those benefits mandated by this chapter outside of the state of Rhode Island where it
can be established through a pre-authorization process that the required services are not available
in the state of Rhode Island from a provider in the health insurance carrier’s network.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-20.11 of the General Laws entitled "Autism Spectrum Disorders"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20.11-9. Applied behavioral analysis reimbursement rates.
Every group and individual health insurance contract, or every group hospital or medical
expense insurance policy plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this
state, by any health insurance carrier, on or after January 1, 2026, shall reimburse certified, applied
behavior analysis providers, who are designated by the executive office of health and human
services, for applied behavior analysis services at rates of reimbursement equal to, or greater than,
the prevailing integrated state Medicaid rate for applied behavior analysis services as established
by the executive office of health and human services.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001933
========
LC001933 - Page 2 of 3